Washington statutes.
RCW 2.72.070

Annual report to legislature.

(1) By October 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of public guardianship must submit a report to the legislature regarding the demand for the services provided by the office, barriers to service delivery, and outcomes achieved.

(2) The report required in subsection (1) of this section must contain, at a minimum, the following information for the year prior to the report:

(a) The number of contract service providers under contract with the office of public guardianship;

(b) The caseload of each contract service provider;

(c) The number of guardianships, conservatorships, and each of the less restrictive options supported by the office;

(d) The total number of persons prioritized pursuant to RCW 2.72.060;

(e) For each person prioritized pursuant to RCW 2.72.060, the number of days between when the person was deemed medically ready for discharge from a hospital to a postacute care or community setting and when the person was discharged from the hospital;

(f) A summary of postdischarge outcomes with regard to persons prioritized pursuant to RCW 2.72.060; and

(g) Policy recommendations for consideration by the legislature.

[ 2024 c 267 s 16.]